Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2026.01
Reentry license; issuance; qualifications;
department; powers; supervision; conversion of license; period valid; renewal.

(1) The department, with
the recommendation of the board, may issue a reentry license to a physician
who has not actively practiced medicine for the two-year period immediately
preceding the filing of an application for a reentry license or who has not
otherwise maintained continued competency during such period as determined
by the board.

(2) To qualify for a reentry
license, the physician shall meet the same requirements for licensure as a
regular licensee and submit to evaluations, assessments, and an educational
program as required by the board.

(3) If the board conducts an assessment and determines
that the applicant requires a period of supervised practice, the department,
with the recommendation of the board, may issue a reentry license allowing
the applicant to practice medicine under supervision as specified by the board.
After satisfactory completion of the period of supervised practice as determined
by the board, the reentry licensee may apply to the department to convert
the reentry license to a license issued under section 38-2026.

(4) After an assessment
and the completion of any educational program that has been prescribed, if
the board determines that the applicant is competent and qualified to practice
medicine without supervision, the department, with the recommendation of the
board, may convert the reentry license to a license issued under section 38-2026.

(5) A reentry license shall
be valid for one year and may be renewed for up to two additional years if
approved by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

(6) The issuance of a reentry
license shall not constitute a disciplinary action.

Laws 2011, LB406, § 3.